Washington statutes.
RCW 18.44.195

Examination.

(1) Any person desiring to become a licensed escrow officer must successfully pass an examination as required by the director.

(2) The examination shall be in such form as prescribed by the director with the advice of the committee.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 48; 2010 c 34 s 9; 1999 c 30 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 21: See note following RCW 72.23.025.